California statutes. Public Resources Code
Each state and local agency shall cooperate with the commission in carrying out its duties under this chapter. Such cooperation shall include, but is not limited to, transmitting copies, at the commission’s expense, of appropriate sections of all environmental impact reports relating to property identified by the commission as of special religious significance to Native Americans or which is reasonably foreseeable as such property.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1332.)
-------------------------------------------

5097.96.

The commission may prepare an inventory of Native American sacred places that are located on public lands and shall review the current administrative and statutory protections accorded to such places. The commission shall submit a report to the Legislature no later than January 1, 1979, in which the commission shall report its findings as a result of these efforts and shall recommend such actions as the commission deems necessary to preserve these sacred places and to protect the free exercise of the Native American religions.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1332.)
-------------------------------------------

5097.97.

In the event that any Native American organization, tribe, group, or individual advises the commission that a proposed action by a public agency may cause severe or irreparable damage to a Native American sanctified cemetery, place of worship, religious or ceremonial site, or sacred shrine located on public property, or may bar appropriate access thereto by Native Americans, the commission shall conduct an investigation as to the effect of the proposed action. Where the commission finds, after a public hearing, that the proposed action would result in such damage or interference, the commission may recommend mitigation measures for consideration by the public agency proposing to take such action. If the public agency fails to accept the mitigation measures, and if the commission finds that the proposed action would do severe and irreparable damage to a Native American sanctified cemetery, place of worship, religious or ceremonial site, or sacred shrine located on public property, the commission may ask the Attorney General to take appropriate legal action pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 5097.94.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1332.)
-------------------------------------------

5097.98.

(a) Whenever the commission receives notification of a discovery of Native American human remains from a county coroner pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 7050.5 of the Health and Safety Code, it shall immediately notify those persons it believes to be most likely descended from the deceased Native American. The descendants may, with the permission of the owner of the land, or his or her authorized representative, inspect the site of the discovery of the Native American human remains and may recommend to the owner or the person responsible for the excavation work means for treatment or disposition, with appropriate dignity, of the human remains and any associated grave goods. The descendants shall complete their inspection and make recommendations or preferences for treatment within
 48 hours of being granted access to the site.

(b) Upon the discovery of Native American remains, the landowner shall ensure that the immediate vicinity, according to generally accepted cultural or archaeological standards or practices, where the Native American human remains are located, is not damaged or disturbed by further development activity until the landowner has discussed and conferred, as prescribed in this section, with the most likely descendants regarding their recommendations, if applicable, taking into account the possibility of multiple human remains. The landowner shall discuss and confer with the descendants all reasonable options regarding the descendants’ preferences for treatment.

(1) The descendants’ preferences for treatment may include the following:

(A) The nondestructive removal and analysis
 of human remains and items associated with Native American human remains.

(B) Preservation of Native American human remains and associated items in place.

(C) Relinquishment of Native American human remains and associated items to the descendants for treatment.

(D) Other culturally appropriate treatment.

(2) The parties may also mutually agree to extend discussions, taking into account the possibility that additional or multiple Native American human remains, as defined in this section, are located in the project area, providing a basis for additional treatment measures.

(c) For the purposes of this section, “conferral” or “discuss and confer” means the meaningful and timely discussion and
 careful consideration of the views of each party, in a manner that is cognizant of all parties’ cultural values, and where feasible, seeking agreement. Each party shall recognize the other’s needs and concerns for confidentiality of information provided to the other.

(d) (1) Human remains of a Native American may be an inhumation or cremation, and in any state of decomposition or skeletal completeness.

(2) Any items associated with the human remains that are placed or buried with the Native American human remains are to be treated in the same manner as the remains, but do not by themselves constitute human remains.

(e) Whenever the commission is unable to identify a descendant, or the descendants identified fail to make a recommendation, or the landowner or his or her authorized representative
 rejects the recommendation of the descendants and the mediation provided for in subdivision (k) of Section 5097.94, if invoked, fails to provide measures acceptable to the landowner, the landowner or his or her authorized representative shall reinter the human remains and items associated with Native American human remains with appropriate dignity on the property in a location not subject to further and future subsurface disturbance. To protect these sites, the landowner shall do one or more of the following:

(1) Record the site with the commission or the appropriate Information Center.

(2) Utilize an open-space or conservation zoning designation or easement.

(3) Record a document with the county in which the property is located. The document shall be titled “Notice of Reinterment of Native American Remains” and
 shall include a legal description of the property, the name of the owner of the property, and the owner’s acknowledged signature, in addition to any other information required by this section. The document shall be indexed as a notice under the name of the owner.

(f) Upon the discovery of multiple Native American human remains during a ground disturbing land development activity, the landowner may agree that additional conferral with the descendants is necessary to consider culturally appropriate treatment of multiple Native American human remains. Culturally appropriate treatment of the discovery may be ascertained from a review of the site utilizing cultural and archaeological standards. Where the parties are unable to agree on the appropriate treatment measures the human remains and items associated and buried with Native American human remains shall be reinterred with appropriate dignity, pursuant to subdivision (e).

(g) Notwithstanding Section 5097.9, this section, including those actions taken by the landowner or his or her authorized representative to implement this section and any action taken to implement an agreement developed pursuant to subdivision (l) of Section 5097.94, shall be exempt from the requirements of the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)).

(h) Notwithstanding Section 30244, this section, including those actions taken by the landowner or his or her authorized representative to implement this section and any action taken to implement an agreement developed pursuant to subdivision (l) of Section 5097.94, shall be exempt from the requirements of the California Coastal Act of 1976 (Division 20 (commencing with Section 30000)).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 208, Sec. 6.   (SB 833)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

5097.99.

(a) No person shall obtain or possess any Native American artifacts or human remains which are taken from a Native American grave or cairn on or after January 1, 1984, except as otherwise provided by law or in accordance with an agreement reached pursuant to subdivision (l) of Section 5097.94 or pursuant to Section 5097.98.

(b) Any person who knowingly or willfully obtains or possesses any Native American artifacts or human remains which are taken from a Native American grave or cairn after January 1, 1988, except as otherwise provided by law or in accordance with an agreement reached pursuant to subdivision (l) of Section 5097.94 or pursuant to Section 5097.98, is
 guilty of a felony which is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code.

(c) Any person who removes, without authority of law, any Native American artifacts or human remains from a Native American grave or cairn with an intent to sell or dissect or with malice or wantonness is guilty of a felony which is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 557.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

5097.991.

It is the policy of the state that Native American remains and associated grave artifacts shall be repatriated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 370, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 1.76. Native American Historic Resource Protection Act [5097.993. - 5097.994.]

5097.993.

(a) (1) A person who unlawfully and maliciously excavates upon, removes, destroys, injures, or defaces a Native American historic, cultural, or sacred site, that is listed or may be eligible for listing in the California Register of Historic Resources pursuant to Section 5024.1, including any historic or prehistoric ruins, any burial ground, any archaeological or historic site, any inscriptions made by Native Americans at such a site, any archaeological or historic Native American rock art, or any archaeological or historic feature of a Native American historic, cultural, or sacred site, is guilty of a misdemeanor if the act was committed with specific intent to vandalize, deface, destroy, steal, convert, possess, collect, or sell a Native American historic, cultural, or sacred artifact, art object, inscription, or feature, or site, and the act was committed as follows:

(A) On public land.

(B) On private land, by a person, other than the landowner, as described in subdivision (b).

(2) A violation of this section is punishable by imprisonment in the county jail for up to one year, by a fine not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(b) This section does not apply to any of the following:

(1) An act taken in accordance with, or pursuant to, an agreement entered into pursuant to subdivision (l) of Section 5097.94.

(2) An action taken pursuant to Section 5097.98.

(3) An act taken in accordance with the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)).

(4) An act taken in accordance with the National Environmental Policy Act of 1969 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 4321 et seq.).

(5) An act authorized under the Z’berg-Nejedly Forest Practice Act of 1973 (Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 4511) of Part 2 of Division 4).

(6) An action taken with respect to a conservation easement in accordance with Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 815) of Division 2 of the Civil Code, or any similar nonperpetual enforceable restriction that has as its purpose the conservation, maintenance, or provision of physical access of Native Americans to one or more Native American historic, cultural, or sacred sites, or pursuant to a contractual agreement for that purpose to which most likely descendents of historic Native American inhabitants are signatories.

(7) An otherwise lawful act undertaken by the owner, or an employee or authorized agent of the owner acting at the direction of the owner, of land on which artifacts, sites, or other Native American resources covered by this section are found, including, but not limited to, farming, ranching, forestry, improvements, investigations into the characteristics of the property conducted in a manner that minimizes adverse impacts unnecessary to that purpose, and the sale, lease, exchange, or financing of real property.

(8) Research conducted under the auspices of an accredited postsecondary educational institution or other legitimate research institution on public land in accordance with applicable permitting requirements or on private land in accordance with otherwise applicable law.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 5097.995 by Stats. 2004, Ch. 286, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

5097.994.

(a) A person who violates subdivision (a) of Section 5097.993 is subject to a civil penalty not to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) per violation.

(b) A civil penalty may be imposed for each separate violation of subdivision (a) in addition to any other civil penalty imposed for a separate violation of any other provision of law.

(c) In determining the amount of a civil penalty imposed pursuant to this section, the court shall take into account the extent of the damage to the resource. In making the determination of damage, the court may consider the commercial or archaeological value of the resource involved and the cost to restore and repair the resource.

(d) A civil action may be brought pursuant to this section by the district attorney, the city attorney, or the Attorney General, or by the Attorney General upon a complaint by the Native American Heritage Commission.

(e) (1) All moneys collected from civil penalties imposed pursuant to this section as a result of an enforcement action brought by a city or county shall be distributed to the city or county treasurer of the city or county that brought the action. These moneys shall be first utilized to repair or restore the damaged site, and the remaining moneys shall be available to that city or county to offset costs incurred in enforcing this chapter.

(2) All moneys collected from civil penalties imposed pursuant to this section as a result of an enforcement action brought by the Attorney General shall be first distributed to, and utilized by, the Native American Heritage Commission to repair or restore the damaged site, and the remaining moneys shall be available to the Attorney General to offset costs incurred in enforcing this chapter.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 5097.996 by Stats. 2004, Ch. 286, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 1.77. California Indian Heritage Center Task Force [5097.997. - 5097.998.]

5097.997.

For the purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “ Heritage center” means the California Indian Heritage Center.

(b) “Task force” means the California Indian Heritage Center Task Force as described in Section 5097.998.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 5097.993 by Stats. 2004, Ch. 286, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

5097.998.

(a) The California Indian Heritage Center Task Force is hereby created within the department. The task force shall be convened by the department on or before February 1, 2003.

(b) The task force shall consist of 9 voting members, appointed as follows:

(1) Three members from separate California Indian tribes, appointed by the director. Each member shall reside in California at the time of appointment. The director shall consider geographic and cultural diversity when making the appointments.

(2) Two members from California Indian tribes shall be appointed by the Executive Secretary of the Native American Heritage Commission. In making these appointments, the executive secretary shall select those individuals who have demonstrated an expertise in any of the following areas:

(A) American Indian education.

(B) California Indian arts, culture, and language.

(C) California Indian history.

(3) One member shall be the director or his or her designee. This member shall serve as the executive secretary of the task force and coordinate work product and assistance with the department.

(4) One member shall be the Executive Secretary of the Native American Heritage Commission or his or her designee.

(5) One member shall be the State Librarian or his or her designee.

(6) One member shall be the Secretary of the Resources Agency or his or her designee.

(c) The task force shall elect a chairperson and determine the term of office of the chairperson by majority vote.

(d) Members of the task force may not receive any state compensation for their services or be reimbursed for travel or per diem expenses.

(e) The duties and responsibilities of the task force shall include, but shall not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Making recommendations to the department on the potential siting of the heritage center. Every effort shall be made to site the heritage center within proximity of other cultural and historical facilities. The siting recommendations shall also take into consideration the public accessibility of the facility. A task force report on the potential sites for the heritage center shall be delivered to the department no later than one year after the task force is convened.

(2) Advising and making recommendations to the department on the cultural concepts and designs of the heritage center.

(3) Establishing and maintaining communication between tribes, museums, and local, state, and federal agencies.

(4) Requesting and utilizing the advice and services of tribes, museums, and local, state, and federal agencies as needed to carry out the objectives of this chapter.

(5) Developing and recommending to the department a governing structure for the ongoing operation of the heritage center.

(6) Preparing and submitting to the Legislature an annual report detailing the task force’s activities and progress towards establishing the heritage center.

(f) The task force’s responsibilities shall be complete and its duties discharged when the heritage center is completed and the department has adopted a governing structure for the completed heritage center. The director may terminate the task force prior to that time, but only if the director obtains approval from two-thirds of the task force members.

(g) The department shall make every effort to encourage nonstate participation and partnerships in the development and construction of the heritage center.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 5097.994 by Stats. 2004, Ch. 286, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 1.78. California Indian Heritage Center [5097.999. - 5097.999.]

5097.999.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the department develop a California Indian Heritage Center for cultural preservation, learning and exchange, land stewardship, and a place to engage all visitors in celebrating the living cultures of California tribes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 51, Sec. 28.   (SB 854)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 1.8. Federal Grants for Acquisition and Development Projects [5098. - 5098.3.]

5098.

As used in this chapter, “fund” means the State Parks and Recreation Fund. Any reference to the Park and Recreation Revolving Account in the General Fund shall mean the State Parks and Recreation Fund, as created by Section 5010.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1065.)
-------------------------------------------

5098.1.

All federal grants which result from the expenditure of state funds for Department of Parks and Recreation acquisition and development projects shall be deposited in the fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1065.)
-------------------------------------------

5098.3.

Except as provided in Section 5098.1, the management and disbursement of moneys in the fund received pursuant to the “Land and Water Conservation Fund Act of 1965” (Public Law 88-578; 78 Stat. 897) are governed by the provisions of Chapter 1.9 (commencing with Section 5099) of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1065.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 1.9. California Outdoor Recreation Resources Plan Act [5099. - 5099.12.]



  ARTICLE 1. Declaration of Policy [5099. - 5099.]

5099.

It is the purpose of this chapter to provide authority to enable the state and its local governmental agencies and subdivisions to participate in the benefits of the “Land and Water Conservation Fund Act of 1965” (Public Law 88-578; 78 Stat. 897).

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1322.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Powers and Duties [5099.2. - 5099.7.]

5099.2.

The director shall maintain and keep up to date a comprehensive plan for the development of the outdoor recreation resources of the state. Such plan shall be prepared so that it meets the requirements of the “Land and Water Conservation Fund Act of 1965” (Public Law 88-578; 78 Stat. 897) with respect to grants to the states under that act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1322.)
-------------------------------------------

5099.3.

The director shall apply to the Department of the Interior of the United States for participation in or the receipt of aid under the Land and Water Conservation Fund Act of 1965. He shall enter into contracts and agreements with the Department of the Interior of the United States, keep financial and other records relating thereto, and furnish to appropriate officials thereof such reports and information as may be reasonably necessary to enable such officials to perform their duties under the act. In connection with obtaining the benefits of the act, the director shall coordinate his activities with, and represent the interests of, all state and local governmental agencies and subdivisions of the state having interests in the planning, development, and maintenance of outdoor recreation resources and facilities. In so doing, the director shall give equal consideration to urban and rural areas in disbursing the fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1322.)
-------------------------------------------

5099.35.

The Legislature recognizes that it is the intended purpose of the Land and Water Conservation Fund Act of 1965, as expressed in such act, that such federal financial assistance as may be provided to the state pursuant to the act shall be in addition to, rather than as a substitute for, state and local outdoor recreation funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1222.)
-------------------------------------------

5099.4.

The director may receive, on behalf of state and local agencies and subdivisions of the state, and disburse any federal funds for outdoor recreation purposes received pursuant to the act. Such funds shall be deposited in the Special Deposit Fund in the State Treasury provided for by Section 16370 of the Government Code, and may be expended under such terms and conditions as may be required by the federal government.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1322.)
-------------------------------------------

5099.5.

The director shall make no commitment or enter into any agreement pursuant to an exercise of authority under this chapter until he has determined that any money or property required to be furnished as the state’s share, if any, of project cost is available for such purpose. It is the legislative intent that, to such extent as may be necessary to assure the proper operation and maintenance of areas and facilities acquired or developed pursuant to the act participated in by this state under authority of this chapter, such areas and facilities shall be publicly maintained for outdoor recreation purposes. The director may enter into and administer agreements with the Department of the Interior of the United States for planning, acquisition, and development projects involving participation in or receipt of aid under the act on behalf of any local governmental agency or subdivision of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1322.)
-------------------------------------------

5099.7.

The director, after receiving a report from the health officer pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 115885 of the Health and Safety Code, shall withhold any funds that are received on or after the effective date of this section from any local agency or subdivision of the state in which a public beach is located and that is in violation of the standards established pursuant to Section 115880 of the Health and Safety Code. The director may disburse any of those funds to the local agency or subdivision only when he or she determines the standards established pursuant to Section 115880 of the Health and Safety Code are being complied with.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 401.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Administration [5099.10. - 5099.12.]

5099.10.

The director shall propose rules and regulations which establish standards governing the disbursement of funds received by him pursuant to this chapter. The director shall hold a public hearing on such proposed rules and regulations, before March 1, 1968, in the following locations: (1) Redding or Red Bluff; (2) Sacramento; (3) Los Angeles; and (4) San Diego. After March 1, 1968, the director may hold hearings as he deems necessary on revisions of the rules and regulations as originally adopted pursuant to this section, and he shall hold hearings on such proposed revisions upon request. Rules and regulations which have been adopted or revised pursuant to this section shall be published in the California Administrative Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1322.)
-------------------------------------------

5099.11.

The director shall transmit a copy of rules and regulations which have been adopted, and shall annually transmit any adopted revisions thereof, to each Member of the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1322.)
-------------------------------------------

5099.12.

Of the annual apportionment of funds received by the director pursuant to this chapter, 60 percent shall be allocated for local governmental agency projects and 40 percent for state agency projects. The state agency share shall be disbursed to the following state agencies in the following percentages: 60 percent to the Department of Parks and Recreation; 35 percent to the Wildlife Conservation Board or the Department of Fish and Game; and 5 percent to the Department of Water Resources. The State Coastal Conservancy established pursuant to Section 31100 is eligible to compete for grants of funds for projects of an outdoor recreational nature from the 6-percent contingency fund established by this section.

If either the state or local governmental agencies are unable to utilize their allocation of funds, the director shall allocate the uncommitted funds to those state or local governmental agencies that are in position to take advantage of the funds during the year in which they are allocated. The 60-percent allocation for local governmental agency projects and the 40-percent allocation to state agency projects shall not be computed until the costs of maintaining and keeping up to date the plan required pursuant to Section 5099.2 and an additional 6 percent for deposit to a contingency fund have been deducted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 481.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Counties and Cities [5101. - 5386.]



  ARTICLE 1. Monuments [5101. - 5109.]

5101.

The board of supervisors of any county or the governing body of any city, may receive devises, bequests, donations, and gifts, for the purpose of erecting, within the county, or city, a monument in memory of California pioneers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5102.

When, in the opinion of the board of supervisors or other governing body, the devises, bequests, donations, and gifts received are sufficient for the purpose, it may erect the monument.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5103.

The board of supervisors or other governing body may submit to the qualified electors of the county, or the city, the question whether taxes for the erection of a monument to the California pioneers shall be levied on the taxable property of the county or city. The question shall be submitted at a general or other election held in the county or city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5104.

Twenty days’ notice of the election shall be given by posting in at least three public places in the county, or the city. The notices shall state specifically the amount to be raised and the purpose. If a majority of all the votes cast at the election are in favor of the proposal, the tax provided for in this article is authorized.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5105.

The ballots shall have printed on them the words “Shall the measure (stating the nature thereof) be adopted?” To the right or below the statement of the measure to be voted on, the words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 303, Sec. 26.   (AB 1512)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

5106.

When the tax has been voted in a county, the board of supervisors, in the next annual levy of taxes, shall levy a tax on the property in the county, sufficient to produce the amount voted for the purpose, which tax shall be assessed and collected in the same manner as other taxes are levied and collected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5107.

When the tax has been voted in a city, its governing body, in the next annual levy of taxes, shall levy a tax on the property in the city, sufficient to produce the amount voted for the purpose, which tax shall be assessed and collected in the same manner as other taxes are levied and collected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5108.

When the taxes so raised and collected are available, the board of supervisors, in case of monuments for a county, and the governing body of a city, in case of monuments for a city, shall proceed to carry out the purpose for which the money was voted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5109.

The boards of supervisors in the several counties may appropriate money from the general fund of the county to erect monuments or to place tablets to commemorate historic spots or places within the limits of the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. County Museums, and Historical Records and Property [5120. - 5132.]

5120.

The board of supervisors of any county may by ordinance declare its intention to establish and maintain a museum of history, science, art, or similar objects. After the ordinance has taken effect, the board may exercise any or all of the powers provided in this article, directly or by agents under its direction and control. The board may exercise any other power necessary and proper to promote the objects and purposes of a museum devoted to the acquisition, exhibition, and utilization of scientific, artistic, historical, or similar material.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5121.

The board may acquire and manage real and personal property necessary properly to house and care for the exhibits and materials placed in the museum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5122.

The board may acquire and maintain a library in furtherance of the objects of the museum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5123.

The board may purchase, collect, trade, exchange, or otherwise acquire exhibition or study material proper or necessary for the use of the museum, and may sell, lend, or exchange material, according to the established custom of museums.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5124.

The board may conduct lectures, entertainments and receptions, and hold meetings in furtherance of the interests of the museum for the purpose of acquainting the public with material or exhibitions in the museum, or in order that the educational advantages offered by the museum may be widely distributed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5125.

The board may conduct or assist study, investigation, or research in any department established in the museum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5126.

The board may conduct special or technical schools or institutes for instruction in any of the matters pertaining to or connected with the museum, may issue certificates evidencing completion of the instruction taken to the satisfaction of the board, and may charge fees necessary to defray the cost of instruction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1504.)
-------------------------------------------

5127.

The board may cooperate with other governmental agencies, with universities, colleges, technical schools, societies, or individuals in the advancement of learning in the arts and sciences.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5128.

The board may publish documents pertaining to the work of the museum and may sell, exchange, or distribute them without charge.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5129.

The board may employ curators, attendants, or other persons necessary to conduct the museum and to carry out the powers granted by this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5130.

Any county in which a museum has been established and is being maintained under this article may become associated with other governmental agencies, associations, societies, or persons in any society, association, or conference the purpose of which is the promotion of museums and the objects advanced by museums, and its board of supervisors may send a representative to any meeting of any such society, association, or conference.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5131.

Under such limitations and restrictions as are prescribed by law, boards of supervisors may permit nonprofit incorporated historical societies to withdraw from the county records for exhibition purposes within the county any original document filed prior to January 1, 1876, when application for withdrawal is made in writing by an authorized agent of the society. A certified copy of the document shall be prepared at the applicant’s expense, and filed in place of the original.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5132.

Under such limitations and restrictions as are prescribed by law, boards of supervisors may place in the custody and control of the county historical society, or its trustees or other directors, any records, landmarks, or other property, real or personal, of the county having only historical value. The trustees and directors shall at all times be appointed by the historical society with the consent and approval of the board of supervisors and shall not receive compensation from the county. The board of supervisors may prescribe reasonable conditions for the delivering of the property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Local Art Galleries and Museums [5135. - 5138.]

5135.

Every city and every county may accept title to real property for museum or art gallery purposes, or permit the erection of buildings and improvements for such purposes on lands owned by the city or county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 1171.)
-------------------------------------------

5136.

Whenever any donation of real property has been made to a city or county for museum or art gallery purposes, or any building or improvements therefor have been erected upon public lands by an individual or corporation without cost to the city or county, the governing body of the city or county may delegate the management, operation, maintenance and regulation thereof to the donor or his successors, or to boards of trustees or directors nominated by the donor and appointed by the governing body of the city or county, upon such terms and conditions as the governing body may prescribe.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 1171.)
-------------------------------------------

5137.

In every instance of such delegation of power the governing body of the city or county shall require:

(a) That all members of the public shall be admitted to the gallery or museum at reasonable times, which times shall be specifically approved by the governing body of the city or county.

(b) That no charges for admission to the gallery or museum shall be made other than such charges as may be determined by the governing body of the city and county to be necessary to defray the cost of operation and maintenance of the gallery or museum; and that all accounts and financial records of the donor or the board of directors or managers nominated by him relating to the operation, management, or maintenance of the gallery or museum shall be subject to such inspection and audit as may be directed by the governing body of the city or county; and 

(c) That all questions involving the determination of policy or the exercise of discretion in the management, operation, maintenance, or regulation of the gallery or museum shall be referred to the governing body of the city or county, together with the recommendations of the donor or the board of directors or managers thereon, for determination by the governing body of the city or county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 1171.)
-------------------------------------------

5138.

The governing body of the city or county may appropriate and expend funds for the improvement, operation, expansion and support of any such art gallery or museum, and shall have, in addition to the powers specified in this article, the same powers in respect thereto that a county board of supervisors has in respect to a county museum under the provisions of Article 2 of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 1171.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.6. County Theatrical Schools and Institutes [5140. - 5141.1.]

5140.

In addition to its other powers the board of supervisors of any county with a population of four million or more may:
